Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-261
Town officers; official oaths; no fees for administering.

No town officer shall be entitled to any fee or compensation from any individual elected or chosen to a town office for administering to him the oath of office.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 61, p. 148;

R.S.1913, § 1045;

C.S.1922, § 947;

C.S.1929, § 26-261;

R.S.1943, § 23-261;

Laws 1969, c. 153, § 5, p. 722.